test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-asestaeddje_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - åsestäddje: # N_AGENT (CG and VH)
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Nom: åsestäddje
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Gen: åsestiedje
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Acc: åsestiedjev
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Ill: åsestäddjáj
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Ine: åsestiedjen
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Ela: åsestiedjest
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Com: [åsestedjijn, åsestedjijna]
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Nom: åsestiedje
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Gen: åsestedjij
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Acc: åsestedjijd
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Ill: åsestedjijda
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Ine: åsestedjijn
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Ela: åsestedjijst
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Com: åsestedjij
    åsestäddje+N+Der/Ag+N+Ess: åsestäddjen
 
 
